New York, session 2025-2026, S3687.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Clause (iv) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph 3 of 2 subsection (m) of section 3425 of the insurance law, as amended by chap- 3 ter 805 of the laws of 1984, is amended to read as follows: 4 (iv) the named insured or other operator of the motor vehicle insured 5 under the policy, or the insurer thereof, was reimbursed by or on behalf 6 of a person responsible for the accident or has a judgment against such 7 person; or 8 (v) the named insured was involved in the accident while such named 9 insured was a pedestrian as defined in section one hundred thirty of the 10 vehicle and traffic law. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05239-01-5